Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-102
Ditch, defined; petition, how construed; requirements.

The word ditch, as used in sections 31-101 to 31-138, shall be held to include a drain or watercourse. The petition for any such improvement shall be held to include any side lateral, spur or branch ditch, drain or watercourse necessary to secure the object of the improvement, whether the same is mentioned therein or not; but no improvement shall be located unless a sufficient outlet is provided.

Laws 1881, c. 51, § 2, p. 236;

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 2, p. 453;

R.S.1913, § 1719;

C.S.1922, § 1666;

C.S.1929, § 31-102;

R.S.1943, § 31-102.

Lateral does not qualify words following. Omaha & N.P.R. Co. v. Sarpy County, 82 Neb. 140, 117 N.W. 116 (1908).